Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201879-10,117
Class III school district; teacherage; site; purchase or lease; powers of voters at election or annual or special meeting; tax.

The legal voters of any Class III school district have the power, at an election or at any annual or special meeting, to (1) direct the purchasing or leasing of any appropriate site and the building, hiring, or purchasing of a teacherage for the purpose of providing housing facilities for the school employees of the district, (2) determine the amount necessary to be expended for such purposes the succeeding year, and (3) vote on a tax on the property of the district for the payment of the amount.

Laws 1953, c. 300, § 3, p. 1011;

Laws 1959, c. 401, § 1, p. 1361;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-541;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 763;

Laws 1997, LB 345, § 41;

Laws 2018, LB377, § 79.
January 1, 2019